Utah statutes.
20A-1-608.   Promises of appointment to office forbidden.

(1)  In order to aid or promote his nomination or election, a person may not directly or indirectly appoint or promise to appoint any person or secure or promise to secure, or aid in securing the appointment, nomination, or election of any person to any public or private position or employment, or to any position of honor, trust, or emolument.

(2)  Nothing contained in this section prevents:

(a)  a candidate from stating publicly his preference for, or support of, any other candidate for any office to be voted for at the same primary or election; or

(b)  a candidate for any office in which the person elected will be charged with the duty of participating in the election or nomination of any person as a candidate for any office from publicly stating or pledging his preference for, or support of, any person for that office or nomination.

